Nebraska, session 109, LB37.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB37 LB37
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 9 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Railroad Safety Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds that:
(1) Railroad transportation is a critical component of Nebraska's
economy and provides efficient and cost-effective movement of goods
across the state and beyond;
(2) Protecting Nebraska's residents, environment, and infrastructure
from exposure to hazardous substances carried by trains is a top
priority; and
(3) The safe and efficient operation of railroads requires certain
actions to be taken, including regularly maintaining railroad tracks and
rolling stock, appropriately using technology to detect and address
mechanical and other issues, employing experienced and well-paid workers
with critical skill sets to recognize and avoid accidents, and limiting
the number of cars that trains carry to ensure that trains have
reasonable lengths.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Railroad Safety Act:
(1) Accident has the same meaning as in 49 C.F.R. 225.5;
(2) Class II railroad has the same meaning as in 49 U.S.C. 20102;
(3) Class III railroad has the same meaning as in 49 U.S.C. 20102;
(4) Commission means the Public Service Commission;
(5) Dangerous good means a substance that:
(a) Is corrosive, flammable, explosive, spontaneously combustible,
oxidizing, or water-reactive;
(b) Has the potential to cause significant harm to an individual,
property, or the environment; and
(c) Does not qualify as a hazardous substance;
(6) Defect includes, but is not limited to, hot wheel bearings, hot
wheels, deficient bearings detected through acoustic means, dragging of
equipment, excessive height, excessive weight, a shifted load, a loose
hose, improper rail temperature, or a deficient wheel condition;
-2-

LB37 LB37
2025 2025
(7) Dragging equipment detector means an electronic device or other
technology that monitors a passing train to actively detect and alert
operators of the train of the existence of any objects dragging from the
train;
(8) Hazardous substance has the same meaning as in 49 C.F.R. 171.8;
(9) Highway-rail crossing means:
(a) The point at which any public highway is or will be constructed
across the tracks or other facilities of a railroad at, above, or below
grade;
(b) The point at which the tracks or other facilities of a railroad
are or may be constructed across any public highway at, above, or below
grade;
(c) The point at which any public highway is or will be constructed
across private tracks on which any railroad may operate at, above, or
below grade; or
(d) The point at which private tracks over which any railroad may
operate are or will be constructed across any public highway at, above,
or below grade;
(10) Hot bearings detector means an infrared detector located along
railroad tracks to detect and alert the operators of a passing train to
any overheating of a train's bearings, axles, or wheels;
(11) Incident has the same meaning as in 49 C.F.R. 225.5;
(12) Main line means a segment or route of railroad tracks of any
railroad over which five million or more gross tons of railroad traffic
is transported annually as documented in timetables filed with the
Federal Railroad Administration pursuant to 49 C.F.R. 217.7. Main line
does not include tourist, scenic, historic, or excursion operations as
defined in 49 C.F.R. 238.5;
(13) Pathway crossing means:
(a) The point at which any public pathway is or will be constructed
across the tracks or other facilities of a railroad at, above, or below
-3-

LB37 LB37
2025 2025
grade;
(b) The point at which any tracks or other facilities of a railroad
are or will be constructed across any public pathway at, above, or below
grade;
(c) The point at which any public pathway is or will be constructed
across private tracks over which any railroad may operate at, above, or
below grade; or
(d) The point at which private tracks over which any railroad may
operate are or will be constructed across any public pathway at, above,
or below grade;
(14) Public crossing means a highway-rail crossing or pathway
crossing where the highway or pathway on both sides of the crossing is
under the jurisdiction of or is maintained by the state or any political
subdivision of the state and is open to public travel;
(15) Railroad means a person providing railroad transportation;
(16) Railroad transportation means any form of nonhighway ground
transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic guideways. Railroad
transportation does not include rapid transit operations in an urban area
that are not connected to a general railroad system;
(17) Restricted speed has the same meaning as in 49 C.F.R. 236.812;
(18) Train means a locomotive unit or locomotive units, with or
without cars, that require an air brake test pursuant to 49 C.F.R. part
232 and 49 C.F.R. part 238; and
(19) Wayside detector system means an electronic device or a series
of connected devices that monitors a passing train to determine whether
the train has a defect, including a hot bearings detector and a dragging
equipment detector.
Sec. 4. (1) A railroad shall not operate a train carrying hazardous
substances that has a length greater than eight thousand five hundred
feet on any main line in the state.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section:
-4-

LB37 LB37
2025 2025
(a) A railroad operating a train on any main line in the state shall
have an operational and properly maintained wayside detector system.
Along each main line, the wayside detector system must have a hot
bearings detector and a dragging equipment detector installed at least
every twenty miles;
(b) On or before January 1, 2027, and on or before January 1 of each
year thereafter, a railroad operating a train on any main line in the
state shall submit to the commission a report that, at a minimum,
discloses (i) the nearest milepost number, latitude and longitude
coordinates, or other attribute that specifically identifies the location
of each installed wayside detector system, (ii) the type and
characteristic of each installed wayside detector system, (iii) the
operational status of all installed hot bearings detectors and dragging
equipment detectors, and (iv) any other information regarding wayside
detector systems that the commission deems necessary. The commission
shall electronically submit the report to the Legislature by January 31,
2027, and by January 31 of each year thereafter; and
(c) After a train receives a defect message from a wayside detector
system, the railroad operating the train shall:
(i) Stop the train in accordance with the railroad's applicable
safety procedures;
(ii) Inspect the location of the defect from a position on the
ground;
(iii) If the inspection indicates that the train is safe for
movement, allow the train to proceed along the train's route at a speed
not greater than restricted speed if the train is carrying a hazardous
substance or dangerous good or at a speed of not greater than thirty
miles per hour if the train is not carrying a hazardous substance or
dangerous good;
(iv) Remove and set out any defective car at the earliest
opportunity;
-5-

LB37 LB37
2025 2025
(v) Prepare a written inspection report; and
(vi) Provide the written inspection report to the appropriate
railroad official.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to a Class II
railroad or Class III railroad not exceeding restricted speed.
(4) A railroad operating a train on any main line in the state shall
not permit any train, freight car, passenger car, or railroad
transportation engine to:
(a) Obstruct a public crossing for longer than ten minutes; or
(b) Obstruct a public crossing in a manner that delays an emergency
vehicle in assisting a person or property in danger.
(5) It is not a violation of subsection (4) of this section if the
train, freight car, passenger car, or railroad transportation engine is
continuously moving or if circumstances beyond the railroad's control
prevent the train, freight car, passenger car, or railroad transportation
engine from moving.
Sec. 5. (1) A crew member of a train operated by a railroad in the
state may report to the crew member's designated union representative:
(a) A violation of any of the safety requirements specified in
section 4 of this act;
(b) An injury the crew member or another crew member sustained while
operating a train on any main line in the state or in yard service; or
(c) A death that occurred during the operation of a train or in yard
service.
(2) A designated union representative receiving a report pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section may enter a railroad's place of operation
during reasonable hours to investigate the report. Before entering, the
designated union representative shall give reasonable notice to the
appropriate railroad officer.
Sec. 6. (1) If a railroad or any officer, agent, or employee of the
railroad violates section 4 of this act or, by denying entry to a place
-6-

LB37 LB37
2025 2025
of operation, violates subsection (2) of section 5 of this act, the
commission may impose a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars but
not more than twenty-five thousand dollars on the railroad. Each day of a
continuing violation constitutes a separate violation.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the commission
may impose a fine of up to one hundred thousand dollars per violation if
the commission finds:
(a) The railroad intentionally or knowingly violated section 4 of
this act or subsection (2) of section 5 of this act; or
(b) The railroad's violation was part of a pattern and practice of
repeated violations of section 4 of this act or subsection (2) of section
5 of this act.
(3) All fines collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII,
section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
(4) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
for the determination, imposition, and appeal of fines under this
section.
Sec. 7. (1) On or before January 1, 2027, and at least once every
three years thereafter, each railroad shall offer training to each fire
department having jurisdiction along tracks upon which the railroad
operates in the state. In satisfying this requirement, a railroad may
offer such training simultaneously to more than one fire department.
(2) The training described in subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) Address the general hazards of dangerous goods and hazardous
substances, techniques to assess risks posed to the environment and to
the safety of emergency responders and the public, factors an incident
commander must consider in determining whether to attempt to suppress a
fire or to evacuate the public and emergency responders from an area, and
other strategies for initial response by emergency responders; and
(b) Include suggested protocols or practices for emergency
-7-

LB37 LB37
2025 2025
responders to use to safely accomplish the tasks described in subdivision
(2)(a) of this section.
Sec. 8. In any action brought against a railroad to recover damages
for property damage, personal injury, or death resulting from a crash or
collision, if the train exceeded seven thousand feet in length and the
jury finds that the length of the train caused the property damage,
personal injury, or death in the crash or collision, the recovery by the
plaintiff in such action shall not be diminished due to the comparative
fault of the plaintiff.
Sec. 9. The Railroad Safety Act shall not be construed as giving
the commission jurisdiction or control over the relations between any
railroad and its employees or its employees' order, union, or other
bargaining agent, either contractual or otherwise.
Sec. 10. Section 75-109.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
75-109.01 Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, the
Public Service Commission shall have jurisdiction, as prescribed, over
the following subjects:
(1) Common carriers, generally, pursuant to sections 75-101 to
75-158;
(2) Grain pursuant to the Grain Dealer Act and the Grain Warehouse
Act and sections 89-1,104 to 89-1,108;
(3) Manufactured homes and recreational vehicles pursuant to the
Uniform Standard Code for Manufactured Homes and Recreational Vehicles;
(4) Modular housing units pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Standards
for Modular Housing Units Act;
(5) Motor carrier registration, licensure, and safety pursuant to
sections 75-301 to 75-343, 75-369.03, 75-370, and 75-371;
(6) Pipeline carriers and rights-of-way pursuant to the Major Oil
Pipeline Siting Act, the State Natural Gas Regulation Act, and sections
75-501 to 75-503. If the provisions of Chapter 75 are inconsistent with
-8-

LB37 LB37
2025 2025
the provisions of the Major Oil Pipeline Siting Act, the provisions of
the Major Oil Pipeline Siting Act control;
(7) Railroad carrier safety pursuant to the Railroad Safety Act and
sections 74-918, 74-919, 74-1323, and 75-401 to 75-430;
(8) Telecommunications carriers pursuant to the Automatic Dialing-
Announcing Devices Act, the Emergency Telephone Communications Systems
Act, the Enhanced Wireless 911 Services Act, the 911 Service System Act,
the Intrastate Pay-Per-Call Regulation Act, the Nebraska
Telecommunications Regulation Act, the Nebraska Telecommunications
Universal Service Fund Act, the Telecommunications Relay System Act, the
Telephone Consumer Slamming Prevention Act, sections 86-574 to 86-578,
86-1031, 86-1307, and 86-1308;
(9) Transmission lines and rights-of-way pursuant to sections 70-301
and 75-702 to 75-724;
(10) Water service pursuant to the Water Service Regulation Act; and
(11) Jurisdictional utilities governed by the State Natural Gas
Regulation Act. If the provisions of Chapter 75 are inconsistent with the
provisions of the State Natural Gas Regulation Act, the provisions of the
State Natural Gas Regulation Act control.
Sec. 11. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 12. Original section 75-109.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
Sec. 13. The following section is outright repealed: Section
17-225, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-9-